Vermont, session 2025-2026, S105.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 23 V.S.A. § 1222 is amended to read:
§ 1222. INSPECTION OF REGISTERED VEHICLES
(a)(1) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (3) of this subsection
and for school buses, which shall be inspected as prescribed in section 1282 of
this title, and motor buses as defined in subdivision 4(17) of this title, which
shall be inspected twice during the calendar year at six-month intervals, all
VT LEG #381115 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.105
2025 Page 2 of 4
motor vehicles registered in this State shall undergo a safety and visual
emissions inspection once each year and all motor vehicles that are registered
in this State and are 16 model years old or less shall undergo an emissions or
on board diagnostic (OBD) systems inspection once each year as applicable.
Any
(2) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (3) of this subsection,
any motor vehicle, trailer, or semi-trailer not currently inspected in this State
shall be inspected within 15 days following the date of its registration in the
State of Vermont.
(3)(A) Notwithstanding subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection (a), a
motor vehicle that has a gross vehicle weight rating of not more than 5,000
pounds shall not be required to be inspected pursuant to the provisions of this
section until after 24 months have elapsed since the date of the vehicle’s
manufacture.
(B) All trailers and semi-trailers shall be exempt from inspection
pursuant to the provisions of this section.
* * *
(d) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, an
exhibition vehicle of model year 1940 or before registered as prescribed in
section 373 of this title or a trailer registered as prescribed in subdivision
371(a)(1)(A) of this title shall be exempt from inspection; provided, however,
VT LEG #381115 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.105
2025 Page 3 of 4
the vehicle must be equipped as originally manufactured, must be in good
mechanical condition, and must meet the applicable standards of the inspection
manual.
* * *
Sec. 2. 23 V.S.A. § 1223 is amended to read:
§ 1223. PROHIBITIONS
A person shall not affix or cause to be affixed to a motor vehicle, trailer, or
semi-trailer a certification of inspection that was not assigned by an official
inspection station to such motor vehicle, trailer, or semi-trailer. No person
shall reaffix or cause to be reaffixed an official sticker once removed; instead,
replacement stickers shall be affixed as prescribed by the rules for replacement
sticker agents. A person shall not knowingly operate a motor vehicle, trailer,
or semi-trailer to which a certification of inspection is affixed if the
certification of inspection was not assigned by an official station to that
vehicle, trailer, or semi-trailer.
Sec. 3. 23 V.S.A. § 4(61) is amended to read:
(61) “Storage trailer” means any regularly manufactured box type trailer
that has been removed from normal over-the-highway service and is used
solely for the storage of commodities at a fixed site for extended periods of
time. When a storage trailer is moved over the public highways, it shall not
contain cargo weighing more than 2,000 pounds and shall be properly
VT LEG #381115 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.105
2025 Page 4 of 4
equipped, and in good mechanical condition, and inspectable under the
provisions of section 1222 of this title, except that storage trailers need not
display an inspection sticker.
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #381115 v.1